en: guar flour
de: Guarkernmehl
es: Harina de guar
fi: guarjauho
fr: farine de graines de guar, farine de guar, farine de graine de guar
hr: guar brašno
hu: guarliszt, guar liszt
it: Farina di guar
nb: guarkjernemel
nl: guarpitmeel
sv: guarkärnmjöl, guarkärnamjöl

en: guar gum
bg: гума гуар
ca: goma guar
el: κομμι χαρουτιων
es: goma guar
fi: guarkumi
fr: gomme guar, gomme de guar, guar
hr: guar guma, guma guar
hu: guargumi, guarmézga
it: gomma di guar
ja: グァーガム
nl: guargom
pl: guma guar
pt: goma de guar
ro: gumă guar, guma guar, gumă de guar, guma de guar
uk: гуарова камедь, камедь гуарова

en: xanthan gum and guar gum
bg: гума ксантан и гума гуар
de: Xanthan und Guarkernmehl
es: goma xantana y goma guar
fi: ksantaanikumi ja johanneksenleipäpuujauhe
fr: gomme xanthane et gomme guar, gomme xanthane et gomme de guar
hr: ksantan guma i guar guma
hu: xantángumi és guargumi
it: Gomma xanthan e gomma di guar

en: added sugar, various sugars
af: bygevoegde suiker
ar: سكر مضاف
az: əlavə edilmiş şəkər
be: дададзены цукар
bg: добавена захар
bn: যোগ করা চিনি
bs: dodani šećer
ca: sucres afegits
cs: přidaný cukr
cy: siwgr ychwanegol
da: tilsat sukker
de: zugesetzter Zucker
el: πρόσθετη ζάχαρη
eo: aldonita sukero
es: azúcares añadidos, azúcar añadido
et: lisatud suhkur
eu: gehitutako azukrea
fa: شکر افزوده
fi: lisätty sokeri
fr: sucre ajouté, sucres ajoutés
ga: siúcra breise
gl: azucre engadido
he: סוכר שנוסף
hi: अतिरिक्त चीनी
hr: dodan šećer
hu: hozzáadott cukor
hy: ավելացված շաքարավազ
id: gula tambahan
is: viðbættur sykur
it: zucchero aggiunto
ja: 添加糖
jv: gula tambahan
ka: დამატებული შაქარი
kk: қосылған қант
ko: 첨가당
ku: şekirê zêdekirî
ky: кошулган шекер
la: saccharum additum
lt: pridėtinis cukrus
lv: pievienotais cukurs
mk: додаден шеќер
ms: gula tambahan
nl: toegevoegde suiker
nn: tilsett sukker
no: tilsatt sukker
pl: cukier dodany, cukry dodane
pt: açúcar adicionado
ro: zahăr adăugat
ru: добавленный сахар
sk: pridaný cukor
sl: dodani sladkor
sq: sheqer i shtuar
sr: додатни шећер
sv: tillsatt socker
th: น้ำตาลที่เพิ่ม
tr: ilave şeker
uk: доданий цукор
ur: اضافی چینی
uz: qo'shilgan shakar
vi: đường thêm vào
zh: 添加糖

en: monosaccharide
af: monosakkaried
ar: سكر أحادي
az: Monosakkarid
be: Манацукрыд
bg: Монозахарид
ca: monosacàrid
cs: monosacharid
cy: Monosacarid
da: monosaccharid
de: Monosaccharide
el: μονοσακχαρίτης
eo: Monosakarido
es: monosacáridos
et: Monosahhariid
eu: Monosakarido
fi: monosakkaridi
fr: monosaccharides
ga: Monaisiúicríd
gl: Monosacárido
he: חד-סוכר
hr: monosaharid
hu: Monoszacharid
id: Monosakarida
is: Einlyfja
it: monosaccaridi
ja: 単糖
jv: Monosakarida
ko: 단당류
la: Monosaccharide
lt: Monosacharidas
lv: Monosaharīds
mk: Моносахарид
ms: Monosakarida
nl: monosachariden
no: Monosakkarid
pl: cukry proste, monosacharydy
pt: monossacarídeos
ro: Monozaharidă
ru: моносахариды
sk: Monosacharid
sl: Monosaharid
sq: Monosakarid
sr: Моносахарид
sv: Monosackarid
th: Monosaccharide
tr: Monosakkarit
uk: Моносахарид
vi: Monosaccharide
zh: 单糖

en: sugar
af: Suikers
am: ስኳር
an: Zucre
ar: سكر
as: চেনী
az: Şəkər
ba: Шәкәр
be: Цукар
bg: Захар, захари
bh: चीनी
bn: চিনি
br: Sukr
bs: Šećer
ca: Sucre
ce: Шекар
cs: Cukr
cv: Сахăр
cy: Siwgr
da: sukker, diverse sukkerarter
de: Zucker, verschiedene Zuckerarten
el: Ζάχαρη, Διάφορα είδη ζάχαρης
eo: Sukero
es: azúcar, azúcares
et: suhkur, suhkrud, erinevad suhkrud
eu: Azukre
fa: شکر
fi: sokeri, sokeria, eri hienot sokerit
fr: sucre, divers sucres
fy: sûker
ga: Siúcra
gd: Siùcar
gl: Azucre
gn: Eiratã
he: סוכר
hi: शर्करा
hr: šećeri, šećer, različiti šećeri
ht: Sik
hu: cukor
id: gula
is: sykur, matarsykur
it: zucchero, zuccheri, lo zucchero, diversi zuccheri
iu: ᓱᑲᒃ
ja: 砂糖, 糖類, 砂糖類
jv: Gula
ka: შაქარი
kk: Қант
kn: ಸಕ್ಕರೆ
ko: 설탕
ku: Şekir
ky: Кант
la: saccharum
li: Sókker
ln: Sukáli
lt: Cukrus
lv: Cukurs, dažādi cukuri
mk: Шеќер
ml: പഞ്ചസാര
mn: Элсэн чихэр
ms: Gula
my: သကြား
nb: sukker, diverse sukkertyper
ne: चिनी
nl: suiker, Tafelsuiker, diverse suikersoorten
nn: sukker
nv: Áshįįh łikan
oc: Sucre
or: ଚିନି
pa: ਸ਼ੱਕਰ
pl: cukier, cukier spożywczy, cukry
ps: بوره
pt: Açúcar, diversos açúcares
qu: Asukar
ro: Zahăr, zahar, zaharuri
ru: Сахар, сахар песок, сахара, pазличные сахара
rw: Isukari
sa: शर्करा
sd: کنڊ
sh: Šećer
si: සීනි
sk: Cukor
sl: Sladkor, različni sladkorji
sn: Shuga
so: Sonkor
sq: Sheqeri, sheqer
sr: Шећер, šećer
su: Gula
sv: socker, diverse sockerarter
sw: Sukari
ta: சீனி
te: చక్కెర
tg: Қанд
th: น้ำตาล
tl: Asukal
tr: Şeker
tt: Шикәр
ug: شېكەر
uk: Цукор
ur: شکّر
uz: Qand
vi: Đường
wa: Souke
zh: 糖, 食糖

en: sugared, sugary
ca: ensucrade, ensucrades
da: sukret
es: azucarada, azucaradas
hr: pošećeren
it: zuccherato

en: organic sugar
bg: биологична захар, био захар
da: økologisk sukker
de: Zucker aus ökologischem Anbau
fi: luomusokeri, luomu sokeri
fr: sucre bio, sucre issu de l'agriculture biologique
hr: eko šećer
hu: bio cukor
it: zucchero biologico
nb: økologisk sukker
sv: ekologiskt socker

en: brown sugar
ar: سكر بني
az: Qəhvəyi şəkər
bg: кафява захар
ca: sucre morè
cs: Hnědý cukr
da: farin, brun farin, farinsukker
de: Brauner Zucker, Farinzucker
eo: Bruna sukero
es: azúcar morena, azúcar moreno
eu: azukre beltz
fa: شکر سرخ
fi: fariinisokeri, ruskea sokeri
fr: vergeoise, cassonade, sucre roux
gl: azucre moreno
he: סוכר חום
hr: smeđi šećer
hu: barna cukor
hy: շագանակագույն շաքար
id: Gula cokelat
is: Púðursykur
it: zucchero bruno
ko: 흑설탕
ml: ബ്രൗൺ ഷുഗർ
ms: Gula perang
nb: brunt sukker
nl: basterdsuiker
pl: Brązowy cukier, cukier brązowy
pt: açúcar mascavo
ro: Zahar brun
ru: Коричневый сахар
sv: farinsocker
te: షాడబ చక్కెర
th: น้ำตาลแดง
uk: Коричневий цукор
zh: 紅糖

en: candy sugar, rock candy, crystal candy
da: kandissukker
de: Kandiszucker
fr: sucre candi
hr: bombonski šećer
it: zucchero candito
ja: 氷砂糖
nl: kandijsuiker
pt: açúcar candy, açúcar candi

en: muscovado, muscovado sugar
ca: Sucre mascavat
da: Muscovadosukker
de: Muscovado-Zucker, Muscovadozucker
eo: Muskovado
es: Azúcar mascabado
fr: Sucre muscovado
hr: muscovado
it: Zucchero muscovado
ja: 黒砂糖
nl: bruine suiker
pl: Muscovado
pt: açúcar mascavado
sv: Muscovadosocker

en: invert sugar, inverted sugar
bg: инвертна захар
ca: sucre invertit
cs: Inverzní cukr
da: invertsukker
de: Invertzucker
es: azúcar invertido, azucar liquido invertido
fi: inverttisokeri
fr: sucre inverti
hr: invertni šećer
hu: invertcukor
it: zucchero invertito
lv: invertcukurs
nb: invertsukker
nl: Invertsuiker
pl: Cukier inwertowany
pt: açúcar invertido
ro: zahăr invertit, zahar invertit
sv: invertsocker

en: invert cane sugar, inverted cane sugar
de: Invertrohrzucker
fr: sucre de canne inverti
hr: invertni šećer od trske
it: zucchero di canna invertito
pt: açúcar de cana invertido

en: jaggery, gud, gur, cane jaggery
it: jaggery

en: invert sugar solution
it: soluzione di zucchero invertito
pl: roztwór cukru inwertowanego

en: caramelised sugar
bg: карамелизирана захар
da: karamelliseret sukker
de: Karamellzucker, karamellisierter Zucker
es: azúcar caramelizado
et: karamelliseeritud suhkur
fi: karamellisoitu sokeri, karamellisoitua sokeria, karamellisokeri
fr: sucre brun, sucre caramel, sucre caramélisé
hr: karamelizirani šećer, karameliziran šećer
hu: karamellizált cukor
it: zucchero caramellato, zucchero caramellizzato
nl: gekarameliseerde suiker, gebrande suiker
pl: cukier karmelizowany, cukier skarmelizowany, cukier palony
pt: açúcar caramelizado
ro: zahăr caramelizat
ru: карамелизованный сахар
sv: karamelliserat socker

es: azucar caramelizado en polvo
fr: sucre caramélisé en poudre
pt: açúcar caramelizado em pó

en: white sugar
af: wit suiker
ar: سكر أبيض
az: ağ şəkər
be: белы цукар
bg: бяла захар
ca: sucre blanc
cs: bílý cukr
cy: siwgr gwyn
da: hvidt sukker
de: weißer Zucker, Weißzucker
el: άσπρη ζάχαρη
eo: blanka sukero
es: Azúcar blanco, Azúcar blanco comun, azúcar blanquilla
et: valge suhkur
eu: azukre zuria
fi: valkoinen sokeri
fr: sucre blanc
ga: siúcra bán
gl: azucre branco
he: סוכר לבן
hi: सफेद चीनी
hr: bijeli šečer
hu: fehér cukor
hy: սպիտակ շաքարավազ
id: gula putih
is: hvítur sykur
it: Zucchero bianco
ja: 白砂糖
jv: gula putih
ka: თეთრი შაქარი
kk: ақ қант
ko: 흰 설탕
ku: şekirê spî
ky: ак кант
lt: baltasis cukrus
lv: baltais cukurs
mk: бел шеќер
ms: gula putih
nl: witte suiker
nn: kvitt sukker
no: hvitt sukker
pl: biały cukier, cukier biały
pt: açúcar branco
ro: zahăr alb
ru: сахар белый
sk: biely cukor
sl: beli sladkor
sq: sheqer i bardhë
sr: бели шећер
sv: vitt socker
th: น้ำตาลทรายขาว
tr: beyaz şeker
uk: білий цукор
ur: سفید شکر
uz: oq shakar
vi: đường trắng
zh: 白糖

en: organic brown sugar
bg: био кафява захар
de: Bio brauner Zucker
fi: luomu ruskea sokeri
fr: sucre roux bio
hr: organski smeđi šećer
it: zucchero di canna biologico
nl: biologische bruine suiker

en: liquid sugar
bg: течна захар
de: Flüssigzucker, flüssiger Zucker
es: Azúcar liquido
fi: nestesokeri
fr: sucre liquide
hr: tekući šećer
hu: folyékony cukor
it: Zucchero liquido
pt: açúcar líquido
sv: sockerlösning